Maine, session 132, LD1779.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §1107-A, sub-§1, ¶B, as repealed and replaced by PL 2015,
c. 496, §6, is amended to read:
B. Except as provided in paragraph B‑1, a schedule W drug and the drug contains:
(1) Heroin (diacetylmorphine) and the amount possessed is 2 grams or more than
200 milligrams;
(2) Cocaine and the amount possessed is 2 grams or more than 2 grams;
(3) Cocaine in the form of cocaine base and the amount possessed is 2 grams or
more than 2 grams;
(4) Oxycodone and the amount possessed is 2 grams or more than 200 milligrams;
(5) Hydrocodone and the amount possessed is 2 grams or more than 200
milligrams;
(6) Hydromorphone and the amount possessed is 2 grams or more than 200
milligrams;
(7) Methamphetamine and the amount possessed is 2 grams or more than 200
milligrams; or
(8) Fentanyl powder and the amount possessed is 2 grams or more than 200
milligrams.
Violation of this paragraph is a Class C crime;